Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-304 Examination of guaranty
associations. (a) The Hawaii Insurance Guaranty Association shall be
subject to examination and regulation by the commissioner. The board of
directors shall submit, not later than March 30 of each year, a financial report
for the preceding calendar year in a form approved by the commissioner.

(b) The Hawaii Life and Disability Insurance
Guaranty Association shall be subject to examination and regulation by the
commissioner. The board of directors shall submit to the commissioner each
year not later than one hundred twenty days after the association's fiscal
year, a financial report in a form approved by the commissioner and a report of
its activities during the preceding fiscal year. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L
2003, c 212, §17]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next